hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Osiguravanje od poplava, požara i curenja plina: Kontrolne ploče za dojavu požara; Protupožarni alarmi; Protupožarni pokrivač; Skladištenje aparata i opreme za gašenje požara; Aparati za gašenje požara; Protupožarne prskalice; Detektori topline; Detektori dima i ugljičnog monoksida; Detektori vode i poplave
da: Hjem og have > Oversvømmelses-, ild- og gassikkerhed: Kontrolpaneler til brandalarmer; Brandalarmer; Brandtæpper; Ildslukkerskabe; Ildslukkere; Brandsprinklere; Varmedetektorer; Røg- og kuliltealarmer; Læksøgere
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Sel, Yangın ve Gaz Emniyeti: Yangın Alarmı Kontrol Panelleri; Yangın Alarmları; Yangın Battaniyeleri; Yangın Söndürücüleri ve Ekipmanı Dolabı; Yangın Söndürücüler; Yangın Sprinklerleri; Isı Dedektörleri; Duman ve Karbon Monoksit Detektörleri; Su ve Sel Detektörleri
nl: Huis en tuin > Bescherming tegen brand, gas en water: Bedieningspanelen voor brandalarmen; Brandalarmen; Branddekens; Brandblusserkasten, -standaards en -houders; Brandblussers; Sprinklerinstallaties; Hittedetectoren; Rook- en koolmonoxidemelders; Detectieapparaten voor waterlekken en overstromingen
cs: Dům a zahrada > Ochrana před vytopením, požárem a únikem plynu: Ovládací panely požárních hlásičů; Požární hlásiče; Protipožární deky; Skříňky, stojany a držáky na hasicí přístroje; Hasicí přístroje; Protipožární rozprašovače; Detektory tepla; Detektory kouře a oxidu uhelnatého; Detektory zaplavení a úniku vody
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Segurança em inundações, incêndios e fugas de gás: Painéis de controlo de alarme de incêndio; Alarmes de incêndio; Cobertores anti-fogo; Armazenamento de equipamento e extintores; Extintores; Aspersores de incêndio; Detetores de calor; Detetores de fumo e monóxido de carbono; Detores de água e inundações
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Безопасност при наводнение, пожар и обгазяване: Пожароизвестителни централи; Противопожарни аларми; Противопожарни одеяла; Съхранение на пожарогасители и оборудване; Пожарогасители; Противопожарни пръскачки; Топлинни детектори; Детектори за дим и въглероден оксид; Детектори за вода и наводнения
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Povodňová, požiarna a plynová bezpečnosť: Požiarne ovládacie panely; Požiarne hlásiče; Protipožiarne deky; Uskladnenie hasiacich prístrojov a vybavenia; Hasiace prístroje; Protipožiarne postrekovacie systémy; Tepelné detektory; Detektory dymu a oxidu uhoľnatého; Detektory vody a povodní
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Potvynių, gaisro ir dujų sauga: Priešgaisrinės signalizacijos valdymo pultai; Priešgaisrinė signalizacija; Priešgaisrinės antklodės; Gesintuvų ir įrangos laikymas; Gesintuvai; Priešgaisriniai purkštuvai; Šilumos detektoriai; Dūmų ir anglies monoksido detektoriai; Vandens ir potvynių detektoriai
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Zaščita pred poplavami, požari in uhajanjem plina: Nadzorne plošče za požarne alarme; Požarni alarmi; Protipožarne odeje; Shranjevanje gasilnih aparatov in opreme; Gasilni aparati; Požarne brizgalke; Toplotni detektorji; Detektorji dima in ogljikovega monoksida; Detektorji vode in poplav
hu: Otthon és kert > Árvíz-, tűz- és gázbiztonság: Tűzjelző-vezérlőpanelek; Tűzjelzők; Tűzoltó takarók; Tűzoltókészülék- és felszereléstárhely; Tűzoltó készülékek; Tűzoltó permetezők; Hőérzékelők; Füst- és szén-monoxid-érzékelők; Víz- és árvízérzékelők
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 防洪、消防与可燃气体安全设备: 火警控制面板; 火灾报警器; 灭火毯; 灭火器柜; 灭火器; 喷洒灭火器; 感温探测器; 烟雾和一氧化碳检测器; 液体检漏仪
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 홍수/화재/가스 안전 관리: 화재 경보 제어반; 화재 경보 장치; 방화 담요; 소화기/방화장비 보관함; 소화기; 화재 스프링클러; 열 감지기; 연기/일산화탄소 탐지기; 누수/침수 감지기
fr: Maison et jardin > Sécurité gaz, incendie et inondation: Panneaux de commande d’alarme incendie; Alarmes incendie; Couvertures anti-feu; Boîtiers et stands pour extincteurs et équipement anti-incendie; Extincteurs; Gicleurs d’incendie; Détecteurs de chaleur; Détecteurs de fumée et de dioxyde de carbone; Détecteurs d’eau et d’inondation
th: บ้านและสวน > ความปลอดภัยจากน้ำท่วม ไฟ และก๊าซ: แผงควบคุมสัญญาณเตือนอัคคีภัย; สัญญาณเตือนอัคคีภัย; ผ้าห่มกันไฟ; ที่ดับเพลิงและที่จัดเก็บอุปกรณ์; ที่ดับเพลิง; หัวกระจายน้ำดับเพลิง; เครื่องตรวจจับความร้อน; เครื่องตรวจจับควันและคาร์บอนมอนอกไซด์; ตัวตรวจจับระดับน้ำและน้ำท่วม
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị an toàn khi lũ lụt, hỏa hoạn hoặc rò khí: Bảng điều khiển chuông báo cháy; Chuông báo cháy; Chăn Chữa Cháy; Tủ đựng bình chữa cháy; Bình chữa cháy; Vòi phun chữa cháy; Đầu báo cháy nhiệt; Cảm biến báo khói & khí CO; Đầu báo rò nước & Đầu báo ngập nước
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 防災機器（漏水・火災・ガス）: 火災報知器制御盤; 火災報知機; 防火ブランケット; 消火器用ボックス・スタンド; 消火器; 消火用スプリンクラー; 熱感知器; 煙検知器・一酸化炭素検知器; 漏水・浸水検知器
it: Casa e giardino > Sistemi di sicurezza per inondazioni, incendi e gas: Quadri di controllo per allarmi antincendio; Allarmi antincendio; coperte antincendio; Deposito di attrezzature ed estintori; Estintori; Impianti antincendio a pioggia; Rilevatori di calore; Rilevatori di fumo e monossido di carbonio; Rilevatori di perdite o del livello d'acqua
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Tulva-, tulipalo ja kaasuturvallisuus: Palovaroittimen ohjauspaneelit; Palovaroittimet; Sammutuspeitteet; Palosammuttimien säilytys; Palosammuttimet; Sprinklerijärjestelmät; Lämpövaroittimet; Savu- ja häkävaroittimet; Vesi- ja tulvavaroittimet
nb: Hjem og hage > Flom-, brann- og gassikkerhet: Kontrollpaneler for brannalarmer; Brannalarmer; Branntepper; Brannslukningsapparater og utstyrslagring; Brannslukningsapparater; Sprinkleranlegg; Varmedetektorer; Røyk- og gassdetektorer; Vann- og flomdetektorer
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Ασφάλεια πλημμυρών, πυρκαγιάς & αερίων: Πίνακες ελέγχου συναγερμού πυρκαγιάς; Συναγερμοί πυρκαγιάς; Πυροσβεστικές κουβέρτες; Αποθήκευση πυροσβεστήρων & εξοπλισμού; Πυροσβεστήρες; Ψεκαστήρες φωτιάς; Ανιχνευτές θερμότητας; Ανιχνευτές καπνού & μονοξειδίου του άνθρακα; Ανιχνευτές νερού & πλημμύρας
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 水災/消防/氣體安全: 火警自動警報設備; 火警警報器; 防火毯; 滅火器/滅火裝備放置區; 滅火器; 消防灑水器; 熱探測裝置; 煙霧警報器; 水流/洪汛探測器
ru: Дом и сад > Защита от затоплений, пожаров и утечек газа: Панели управления пожарной сигнализацией; Пожарная сигнализация; Противопожарные одеяла; Хранение огнетушителей и противопожарного инвентаря; Огнетушители; Пожарные спринклеры; Термодетекторы; Детекторы дыма и угарного газа; Датчики утечек воды и затопления
es: Casa y jardín > Protección contra inundaciones, gases e incendios: Paneles de control de alarmas antincendios; Alarmas contra incendios; Mantas ignífugas; Armarios y cajas para extintores; Extintores; Aspersores contra incendios; Detectores de calor; Detectores de humos y monóxido de carbono; Detectores de fugas
de: Heim & Garten > Feuer- & Gasschutz: Feuermelder-Steuerungen; Feuermelder; Feuerlöschdecken; Kästen & Halterungen für Feuerlöscher; Feuerlöscher; Sprinkleranlagen; Hitzemelder; Rauch- & Kohlenmonoxidmelder; Wassermelder
sv: Hem och trädgård > Vatten-, brand- och gassäkerhet: Kontrollpaneler för brandlarm; Brandlarm; Brandfiltar; Skåp för brandsläckare; Brandsläckare; Sprinklers; Värmedetektorer; Rök- och koloxiddetektorer; Läckagedetektorer
pl: Dom i ogród > Bezpieczeństwo powodziowe, ogniowe i gazowe: Panele ochrony przeciwpożarowej; Alarmy przeciwpożarowe; Koce gaśnicze; Szafki i stelaże na gaśnice; Gaśnice; Tryskacze; Wykrywacze ciepła; Czujniki dymu i tlenku węgla; Wykrywacze wycieków
en: Home & Garden > Flood, Fire & Gas Safety: Fire Alarm Control Panels; Fire Alarms; Fire Blankets; Fire Extinguisher & Equipment Storage; Fire Extinguishers; Fire Sprinklers; Heat Detectors; Smoke & Carbon Monoxide Detectors; Water & Flood Detectors
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Segurança contra incêndio, enchentes e gás: Painel de controle de alarme para incêndio; Alarmes de incêndio; Cobertores anti-incêndio; Armários e acessórios para extintores de incêndio; Extintores de incêndio; Rociador automático contra incendios; Detectores de calor; Detectores de fumaça e monóxido de carbono; Detectores de vazamentos
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Siguranță în caz de inundații, incendii și scurgeri de gaze: Panouri de control pentru alarme de incendiu; Alarme de incendiu; Pături antifoc; Depozitare stingătoare și echipamente pentru stingerea incendiilor; Stingătoare; Aspersoare de incendiu; Detectoare de căldură; Detectoare de fum și monoxid de carbon; Detectoare de apă și inundații